Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.12.090

False entries, statements, etc.—Penalty.

Every person who shall knowingly subscribe to or make or cause to be made any false statement or false entry in the books of any bank or holding company, or shall knowingly subscribe to or exhibit any false or fictitious paper or security, instrument or paper, with the intent to deceive any person authorized to examine into the affairs of any bank or holding company, or shall make, state, or publish any false statement of the amount of the assets or liabilities of any bank or holding company, is guilty of a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 2014 c 37 s 181; 2010 c 88 s 26; 2003 c 53 s 186; 1955 c 33 s 30.12.090. Prior: 1917 c 80 s 56; RRS s 3263. Formerly RCW 30.12.090.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 88: See RCW 32.50.900.

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.